Florida, session 2026, HB7009.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (9) of section 350.01, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
350.01 Florida Public Service Commission; terms of
commissioners; vacancies; election and duties of chair; quorum;
proceedings; public records and public meetings exemptions.—
(9) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (8),
those portions of a hearing conducted by the commission wherein
proprietary confidential business information that is
confidential or exempt from s. 119.07(1), pursuant to s.
364.183, s. 366.093, s. 367.156, or s. 368.108, is discussed are
exempt from s. 286.011 and s. 24(b), Art. I of the State
Constitution. No exempt portion of a hearing may be off the
record, and all exempt portions shall be recorded and
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7009-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7009 2026
transcribed. Such recordings and transcripts are confidential
and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
Constitution, unless a court of competent jurisdiction, after an
in camera review, determines that the hearing was not restricted
to the discussion of proprietary confidential business
information made confidential and exempt pursuant to s. 364.183,
s. 366.093, s. 367.156, or s. 368.108. In the event of such a
judicial determination, only that portion of the recording and
transcript which reveals nonexempt information may be disclosed
to a third party. This subsection is subject to the Open
Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and
shall stand repealed on October 2, 2026, unless reviewed and
saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7009-00